Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1504.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 5007, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 5007. A. There is hereby created the Oklahoma Health


Care Authority Board which shall consist of the following nine (9)


members:


1. Five members appointed by the Governor;


2. Two members appointed by the Speaker of the House of


Representatives; and


3. Two members appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the


Senate.



Req. No. 2644 Page 1


B. Each member shall serve at the pleasure of his or her


appointing authority and may be removed or replaced without cause.


Any member of the Board shall be prohibited from voting on any issue


in which the member has a direct financial interest. The


Administrator of the Oklahoma Health Care Authority shall be an ex


officio member of the Board, but shall be entitled to vote only in


case of a tie vote.


C. The Board shall have the power and duty to:


1. Establish the policies of the Oklahoma Health Care


Authority;


2. Appoint and fix the compensation of the Administrator of the


Authority;


3. Adopt and promulgate rules as necessary and appropriate to


carry out the duties and responsibilities of the Authority. The


Board shall be the rulemaking body for the Authority; and


3. 4. Adopt, publish, and submit electronically by January 1 of


each year to the Governor, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate,


and the Speaker of the House of Representatives appropriate


administrative policies and the business plan for that year. All


actions governed by the administrative policies and annual business


plan shall be examined annually in an independent audit.


D. A majority of the members of the Board shall constitute a


quorum for the transaction of business and for taking any official



Req. No. 2644 Page 2


action. Official action of the Board must have a favorable vote by


a majority of the members present.


E. Members appointed pursuant to subsection A of this section


shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for


expenses incurred in the performance of their duties in accordance


with the State Travel Reimbursement Act.


F. The Board and the Authority shall act in accordance with the


provisions of the Oklahoma Open Meeting Act, the Oklahoma Open


Records Act, and the Administrative Procedures Act.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 5008, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 5008. A. The Administrator of the Oklahoma Health Care


Authority shall have the training and experience necessary for the


administration of the Authority, as determined by the Oklahoma


Health Care Authority Board. The Administrator shall be appointed


by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate and shall


serve at the pleasure of the Governor Board and may be removed or


replaced without cause. Compensation for the Administrator shall be


determined by the Governor. The Administrator may be removed from


office by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the members elected to and


constituting each chamber of the Legislature.


B. The Administrator of the Oklahoma Health Care Authority


shall be the chief executive officer of the Authority and shall act


for the Authority in all matters except as may be otherwise provided

Req. No. 2644 Page 3


by law. The powers and duties of the Administrator shall include


but not be limited to:


1. Supervision of the activities of the Authority;


2. Formulation and recommendation of rules for approval or


rejection by the Oklahoma Health Care Authority Board and


enforcement of rules and standards promulgated by the Board;


3. Preparation of the plans, reports, and proposals required by


the Oklahoma Health Care Authority Act, Section 5003 et seq. of this


title, other reports as necessary and appropriate, and an annual


budget for the review and approval of the Board;


4. Employment of such staff as may be necessary to perform the


duties of the Authority including, but not limited to, an attorney


to provide legal assistance to the Authority for the state Medicaid


program; and


5. Establishment of a contract bidding process which:


a. encourages competition among entities contracting with


the Authority for state-purchased and state-subsidized


health care; provided, however, the Authority may make


patient volume adjustments to any managed care plan


whose prime contractor is a state-sponsored,


nationally accredited medical school. The Authority


may also make education or research supplemental


payments to state-sponsored, nationally accredited


medical schools based on the level of participation in

Req. No. 2644 Page 4


any managed care plan by managed care plan


participants,


b. coincides with the state budgetary process, and


c. specifies conditions for awarding contracts to any


insuring entity.


C. The Administrator may appoint advisory committees as


necessary to assist the Authority with the performance of its duties


or to provide the Authority with expertise in technical matters.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2644 DC 1/9/2026 11:18:00 PM



























Req. No. 2644 Page 5